Rhode Island statutes. Title 43 Statutes and Statutory Construction
Chapter 3 Construction and Effect of Statutes

43-3-1.
English statutes as common law.

In all cases in which provision is not made herein, the English statutes, introduced before the Declaration of Independence, which have continued to be practiced under as in force in this state, shall be deemed and taken as a part of the common law of this state and remain in force until otherwise specially provided.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 297, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 366, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 419, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 306, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

43-3-1

.

43-3-2.
Application of rules of construction.

In the construction of statutes the provisions of this chapter shall be observed, unless the observance of them would lead to a construction inconsistent with the manifest intent of the general assembly, or be repugnant to some other part of the statute.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 26, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 32, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 32, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 309, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

43-3-2

.

43-3-3.
Gender of words.

Every word importing the masculine gender only may be construed to extend to and to include females as well as males.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 26, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 32, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 32, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 309, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

4-3-3

.

43-3-3.1.
Gender of titles.

Whenever a title which denotes gender is applied to an individual, the title shall suit the gender of the individual. When the gender is unknown, all nouns and pronouns shall be sex inclusive; provided, that this section shall not be applied retroactively but shall be applied prospectively.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 278, § 1.

43-3-3.2.
Use of appropriate gender language.

When the secretary of state produces a document to instruct the public on the tenets or purpose of a statute, he or she is authorized and empowered to change the language to make the unofficial reproduction of the statute gender-neutral; provided, that the reproduction shall clearly indicate that it is a revised reproduction of a statute by printing the word “unofficial” on its face in bold-letter type.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 378, § 1.

43-3-4.
Singular and plural.

Every word importing the singular number only may be construed to extend to and to include the plural number also, and every word importing the plural number only may be construed to extend to and to embrace the singular number also.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 26, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 32, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 32, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 309, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

43-3-4

.

43-3-5.
Joint authority exercised by majority.

All words purporting to give a joint authority to three (3) or more officers or persons shall be so construed as to give the authority to a majority of them.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 26, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 32, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 32, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 309, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

43-3-5

.

43-3-6.
“Person” defined.

The word “person” extends to and includes co-partnerships and bodies corporate and politic.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 26, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 32, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 32, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 309, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

43-3-6

.

43-3-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 26, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 32, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 32, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 309, § 6; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 287, § 1, effective August 6, 1996.

43-3-7.1.
Use of appropriate disability language.

Whenever the terms “the handicapped,” “handicap person,” or “handicapped person” are used in the general laws, the law revision director shall, unless the director determines it could alter the intent of the statute, recommend that they be replaced with the words “persons with disabilities” or “person with a disability,” inclusive, and whenever the term “handicap” is used in the general laws, the law revision director shall, unless the director determines it could alter the intent of the statute, recommend that it be replaced with the word “disability.”

Whenever the terms “developmental disability” or “developmental disabilities” or “mentally retarded” or “retarded” are used in the general laws, the law revision director shall, unless the director determines it could alter the intent of the statute, recommend that they be replaced with the words “intellectual and developmental disability” or “person with an intellectual and developmental disability,” if the context so requires.

Whenever the terms “substance abuse” or “addict” are used in the general laws, the law revision director shall, unless the director determines it could alter the intent of the statute, recommend that they be replaced with the words “substance use disorder” or “person with a substance use disorder,” if the context so requires.

Whenever an act, resolution, statute, regulation, guideline, directive, or other document of a governmental entity refers to people with disabilities, terms that stigmatize, like “the handicapped,” “the disabled,” “the blind,” “the deaf,” “the hearing impaired,” “cerebral palsied,” “paralytic,” “epileptic,” “confined to a wheelchair,” “wheelchair bound,” “lunatic,” “idiot,” “defective,” “deformed,” “victim,” “suffers from,” “mentally retarded,” “retarded,” “addict,” “substance abuser,” etc., shall not be used. Language that puts the “person first,” rather than the impairment or assistive device, such as “person with a disability,” “child who has mental illness,” “worker who is deaf,” “voter who uses a wheelchair,” “person who is hard-of-hearing,” shall be used.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 287, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 122; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 122; P.L. 2019, ch. 40, § 3; P.L. 2019, ch. 53, § 3.

43-3-8.
“United States” defined.

The words “United States” include the several states and the territories of the United States.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 26, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 32, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 32, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 309, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

43-3-8

.

43-3-9.
Towns include cities.

The word “town” may be construed to include city; the words “town council” include city council; the words “town clerk” include city clerk; the words “ward clerk” include clerk of election district; the words “town treasurer” include city treasurer; and the words “town sergeant” include city sergeant.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 26, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 32, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 32, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 309, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

43-3-9

.

43-3-10.
“Land” and “real estate” defined.

The word “land” or “lands,” and the words “real estate,” may be construed to include lands, tenements, and hereditaments and rights thereto and interests therein.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 26, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 32, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 32, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 309, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

43-3-10

.

43-3-11.
Oaths and affirmations.

The word “oath” includes affirmation; the word “sworn” includes affirmed; and the word “engaged” includes either sworn or affirmed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 26, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 32, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 32, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 309, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

43-3-11

.

43-3-12.
“Month” and “year” defined.

The words “month” and “year” mean a calendar month and year.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 26, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 32, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 32, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 309, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

43-3-12

.

43-3-13.
Computation of time.

Whenever time is to be reckoned from any day, date, or act done, or the time of any act done, the day, date, or the day when the act is done shall not be included in the computation.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 26, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 32, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 32, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 309, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

43-3-13

.

43-3-14.
“Warden” and “warden’s court” included.

The words “justice of the peace” include warden of the peace and the words “district court” include warden’s court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 26, § 13; G.L. 1909, ch. 32, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 32, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 309, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

43-3-14

.

43-3-15.
“Seal” defined.

Whenever a seal is required to be affixed to any paper, the word “seal” shall be construed to include an impression of the seal made with or without the use of wax or wafer on the paper.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 26, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 32, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 32, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 309, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

43-3-15

.

43-3-16.
General definitions — Statutory references.

The word “magistrate” may be construed to mean a justice, or a clerk acting as a justice, of a district court.

The words “written” and “in writing” include printing, engraving, lithographing, and photo-lithographing, and all other representations of words in letters of the usual form.

The words “preceding” and “following,” whenever used by way of reference to any chapter or section of the general laws, shall be construed to mean the chapter or section next preceding or next following; and whenever reference is made in the general laws to a title, chapter, or section without further description, the reference shall be construed to mean the designated title, chapter, or section of the general laws.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 26, § 20; G.L. 1909, ch. 32, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 32, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 309, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

43-3-16

.

43-3-17.
“Rhode Island highway system” defined.

Wherever the words “state highway system”, “state highways”, “state roads”, or any other words referring to public roads occur in any general law, public law, act, or resolution of the general assembly, they shall be defined as found in chapter 8 of title 24, unless the context of the law, act, or resolution requires a different construction as may be deemed necessary by the director of transportation.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 32, § 24; P.L. 1927, ch. 1054, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 309, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

43-3-17

; P.L. 1988, ch. 633, § 7.

43-3-18.
“Product of the farm” or “farm product” defined.

Whenever the words “product of the farm” or “farm product” are used, they shall be construed to include all agricultural, horticultural, vegetable, fruit, or other products of the soil, livestock products, poultry, eggs, dairy products, nuts, mushrooms, honey, and beeswax; provided, that this definition does not include forest products.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 32, § 25; P.L. 1929, ch. 1358, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 309, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

43-3-18

.

43-3-19.
Registered and certified mail.

Wherever the term “registered mail” is used in the general or public laws of this state, or any amendment thereto, the term “registered or certified mail” shall be substituted therefor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3717, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

43-3-19

.

43-3-20.
Financial reports.

Wherever in any general law, public law, act, or resolution of the general assembly an officer, board, commission, state department, or agency is required to make a financial report of its receipts and disbursements or its requirements, the required report means a report to the state controller as required by chapter 6 of title 35; provided, that nothing in this section shall apply to the reports required to be made to the governor and to the general assembly by the state controller.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 32, § 26; P.L. 1931, ch. 1737, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 309, § 23; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

43-3-20

.

43-3-21.
Incorporation acts in evidence.

Every act of incorporation shall be so far deemed a public act that the act may be declared on and given in evidence without specially pleading it.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 26, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 32, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 32, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 309, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

43-3-21

.

43-3-22.
Effect of repeal on prior rights and proceedings.

The repeal of any statute shall in no case affect any act done, any right accrued, acquired, or established, or any suit or proceeding had or commenced in any civil case before the time when the repeal takes effect.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 26, § 16; G.L. 1909, ch. 32, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 32, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 309, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

43-3-22

.

43-3-22.1.
Enlargement of statutes of limitation — Effect on actions not yet expired.

Whenever any time limitation for the commencement of any cause of action is enlarged, the amendment shall be construed to enlarge to the new time limitation all of those causes of action which accrued within the new limitation of time.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 410, § 2.

43-3-23.
Effect of repeal on criminal prosecutions.

No suit, prosecution, or indictment pending at the time of the repeal of any statute for any offense committed or for the recovery of any fine, forfeiture, or penalty incurred under the statute so repealed shall in any case be affected by the repeal, but the suit, prosecution, or indictment may be proceeded with, and the act shall be deemed to be in force for the purpose of prosecuting the act to final judgment and execution or sentence, as the case may be.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 26, § 17; G.L. 1909, ch. 32, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 32, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 309, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

43-3-23

.

43-3-24.
Repeal not reviving.

The repeal of any statute shall not be construed to revive any other statute which has been repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 26, § 18; G.L. 1909, ch. 32, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 32, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 309, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

43-3-24

.

43-3-25.
Effective date of statutes.

Every statute enacted on or prior to July 1 in a calendar year, which does not expressly prescribe the time it shall go into operation, shall take effect on the first day of July of the calendar year of its enactment into law by the general assembly. Any bill enacted after July 1 in a calendar year, which does not expressly prescribe the time it shall go into operation, shall take effect on the date of passage of the bill.

For any statute enacted which requires any new expenditure of money or any increased expenditure of money by a city or town which states that it shall take effect upon passage, the effective date shall be deemed to mean July 1st of the calendar year following the year of enactment unless a specific date of enactment is stated.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 26, § 19; G.L. 1909, ch. 32, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 32, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 309, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

43-3-25

; P.L. 1985, ch. 99, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 349, § 1.

43-3-26.
Conflicting general and special provisions.

Wherever a general provision shall be in conflict with a special provision relating to the same or to a similar subject, the two (2) provisions shall be construed, if possible, so that effect may be given to both; and in those cases, if effect cannot be given to both, the special provision shall prevail and shall be construed as an exception to the general provision.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 26, § 23; G.L. 1909, ch. 32, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 32, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 309, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

43-3-26

.

43-3-27.
Security interests.

“Pledge”, “mortgage”, “conditional sale”, “lien”, “assignment”, and like terms, when used in referring to a security interest in personal property, shall include a corresponding type of security interest under chapter 9 of title 6A.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 147, § 3.

43-3-28.
Proclamation of emergency.

Whenever it shall be determined by the governor that a time of emergency exists in the state brought about by the disruption and/or interruption of transportation, communications, or postal service, and that rights and obligations are adversely affected by the time of emergency, the governor may issue a proclamation which shall set forth the reason for the determination and which shall have the full force and effect of law when a copy is filed in the office of the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 36, § 1.

43-3-29.
Compliance of acts to be performed, authorized, or required following proclamation of emergency.

Notwithstanding any general or public law to the contrary, upon the filing of the proclamation as provided in §

43-3-28

, any act or thing to be done, performed, authorized, or required by a certain day or time, which because of the disruption and/or interruption cannot be done, performed, authorized, or required in the manner as authorized or required by law, contract, or otherwise, shall be deemed to have complied therewith if done, performed, authorized, or required, on or before the next business day following the determination by the governor as provided in §

43-3-30

, and if any further act or thing may be required or authorized to be done, performed, authorized, or required, in consequence of or as a performance subsequent to the initial act or thing required to be done, performed, authorized, or required, the day or time for the further performance, which but for the emergency would have occurred during the period of emergency or later, shall be extended by the duration of the period of emergency to provide for a period of time commensurate with that contemplated had there not been interruption or disruption of service.

Except where the use of postal service is the only means of communication agreed upon by the parties, it shall be the duty of every person to exercise other means of communication as may be reasonably available to him or her to mitigate the consequences resulting from the emergency so that the rights of all persons shall not be prejudiced.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 36, § 1.

43-3-30.
Termination of emergency.

When it shall be determined by the governor that the time of emergency referred to in §

43-3-28

has ceased, he or she shall by proclamation set forth the determination and cause a copy of the proclamation to be filed in the office of the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 36, § 1.

43-3-31.
Severability.

If any clause, section, paragraph, or other part of §§

43-3-28

,

43-3-29

, and

43-3-30

or the application thereof to any person or circumstance shall for any reason be adjudged by a court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, the judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder of the sections or their application to other persons or circumstances.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 36, § 1.

43-3-32.
Construction of §§ 43-3-28 — 43-3-31.

The provisions of §§

43-3-28

—

43-3-31

shall be liberally construed in order to effect their intent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 36, § 1.